Georgia statutes. TITLE 4 Animals
PART 3 Rendering and Disposal Plants

Cross references.

Regulation of business of buying, selling, or transporting dead, dying, or disabled animals or the carcasses of such animals generally, §

26-2-130

et seq.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Meat and poultry inspection, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of Georgia Department of Agriculture, Chapter 40-10. Dead animal disposal, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of Georgia Department of Agriculture, Chapter 40-13-5.

4-4-40.
Definitions.

As used in this part, the term:

“Carcasses of domestic animals” means all or any part or portions of any dead domestic animal not slaughtered for human consumption.

“Collection center” means any approved facility where carcasses of domestic animals from state or federally licensed facilities are collected for loading into approved vehicles for delivery to a rendering plant.

“Rendering plant” means a place of business or location or plant where the carcasses of domestic animals or packing house refuse or other refuse is purchased, received, or unloaded and where such carcasses or refuse is processed for the purpose of obtaining the hide, skin, grease, residue, or any other by-product from such animals or refuse in any way whatsoever.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 480, § 9; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1414, § 1.

4-4-41.
Licenses required; expiration; fee.

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, partnership, or corporation to engage in the business of operating a rendering plant without first applying for and obtaining a license from the Commissioner of Agriculture. Each license shall expire on December 31 of each year, and each application for a license must be accompanied by a license fee of $5.00.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 480, § 12; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1414, § 1.

4-4-42.
Revocation, cancellation, or suspension of licenses.

Every licensed rendering plant which violates the laws of this state or the rules and regulations promulgated by the Commissioner pursuant thereto shall have its license revoked, canceled, or suspended upon a notice and hearing.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 480, § 14; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1414, § 1.

4-4-43.
Rendering plant requirements.

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, partnership, or corporation to operate a rendering plant unless the rendering plant:

Is constructed according to blueprints approved by the Georgia Department of Agriculture; provided, however, that neither blueprints for nor alterations to facilities existing on July 1, 1989, shall be required except to the extent that alterations are necessary for compliance with the other provisions of this part, and to the extent that alterations are necessary for such compliance they shall be made not later than July 1, 1990;

Has walls, floors, and ceilings of concrete or other impervious materials;

Has ample hot water (140 degrees Fahrenheit) to facilitate cleaning of the building, equipment, and vehicles used to move products;

Has adequate drainage constructed and maintained so that no liquid or other matter is permitted to escape therefrom unless into a sewage facility approved by the governmental authority having proper jurisdiction. The document showing approval of such sewage facility must be maintained at the plant for inspection review; and

Is cleaned and sanitized daily to prevent odor and the accumulation of refuse.

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, partnership, or corporation to operate a rendering plant unless all vehicles used in the transportation of carcasses or refuse on public highways are of such construction as to prevent seepage or residue from escaping.

Carcasses or refuse shall not be allowed to accumulate or be held for any period of time at any place other than a licensed slaughtering, processing, or rendering plant or any combination thereof. Such licensed facilities shall have a procedure approved by the department if they accumulate or hold carcasses or refuse for longer than one day’s operation.

Rodent and vermin control shall be diligently practiced with buildings and surrounding grounds kept clean and free of refuse, trash, and manure.

All barrels used for transportation and storage of carcasses or refuse shall be clearly marked “INEDIBLE” with letters not less than two inches in height.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 480, § 10; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1414, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1989, a comma was deleted following “plant” near the end of the first sentence of subsection (c) of this Code section.

4-4-44.
Collection center requirements.

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, partnership, or corporation to operate a collection center until it has applied for and obtained a written permit from the Commissioner to carry on such an operation.

A collection center shall be located on a site in compliance with local zoning ordinances and shall have a sewage facility approved by the governmental authority having proper jurisdiction.

A collection center shall be covered by a metal roof or other permanent type covering with sufficient screened ventilators to allow air flow yet prevent the entry of rodents, birds, and insects.

A collection center shall have adequate drains in an impervious floor with adequate hot water (140 degrees Fahrenheit) to clean thoroughly the collection center premises.

A collection center shall be cleaned and sanitized daily.

The management of a collection center shall agree to hold inedible materials no longer than 24 hours.

With respect to any requirements of subsections (a) through (d) of this Code section which relate solely to the physical construction or alteration of a collection center, the collection center operator shall have until July 1, 1990, to comply with such requirements.

History.

Code 1981, §

4-4-44

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1414, § 1.

Editor’s notes.

Former Code Section 4-4-44 has been redesignated as Code Section 4-4-45 by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1414, § 1.

4-4-45.
Inspections; maintenance of records; maintenance of vehicles.

Every rendering plant shall be subject at all times to inspection by the Commissioner. Each such rendering plant shall keep and furnish the Commissioner such information as he may by rule or regulation require concerning the collection, transportation, distribution, and processing of the carcasses of dead domestic animals or packing house refuse and, further, shall keep and maintain sanitary at all times its vehicles used in the collection, transportation, and distribution of dead domestic animals and packing house refuse.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 480, § 13; Code 1981, §

4-4-44

; Code 1981, §

4-4-45

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1414, § 1.

4-4-46.
Administrative remedies.

Any person affected by this part or by any rule or regulation adopted pursuant to this part shall have and shall be required to exhaust the administrative remedies provided by Code Section 4-6-8.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 480, § 15; Code 1981, §

4-4-45

; Code 1981, §

4-4-46

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1414, § 1.

4-4-47.
Funding of inspection system for slaughtering establishments unable to qualify for federal inspection; adoption of grading standards for use in inspections of such establishments.

The Governor is authorized to make available to the department the funds necessary to provide an inspection system for those slaughtering establishments in this state which are unable to qualify for federal inspection. The department is authorized to adopt appropriate grading standards to be used in the inspection of such establishments so as to indicate on each carcass inspected the grade and quality thereof.

History.

Ga. L. 1959, p. 191; Code 1981, §

4-4-46

; Code 1981, §

4-4-47

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1414, § 1.

4-4-48.
Penalty for violations of part or rules or regulations promulgated thereunder.

Any person, firm, partnership, or corporation which violates any provision of this part or any rule or regulation made pursuant to this part shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 480, § 11; Ga. L. 1956, p. 85, § 2; Code 1981, §

4-4-47

; Code 1981, §

4-4-48

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1414, § 1.